Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Short Title and Reservation of Power

48-51-101. Short title.

Chapters 51-68 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act.”

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 1.01.

Cross-References. Acts of incorporation left unrepealed, § 1-2-105.

Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Business corporations, general provisions, title 48, ch. 11.

Chancery jurisdiction of controversies, § 16-11-105.

Charitable fundraisers — Immunity from suit, § 29-34-204.

Corporations created by general law, Tenn Const., art. XI, § 8.

Elective technical prep high school curriculum credits in association with nonprofit organizations, § 49-6-1207.

Fraternal and patriotic organizations, title 48, ch. 102.

Nonprofit boards, immunity of members, § 48-58-601.

Ownership and conveyance of land by religious societies, title 66, ch. 2, part 2.

Sales and leases by municipalities to and from nonprofit corporations, title 12, ch. 2, part 3.

Solicitation of charitable funds, title 48, ch. 101, part 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1503, 5-1603.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 2, 79, 81, 96; 21 Tenn. Juris., Religious Societies, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Conversions of Nonprofit Hospitals to For-Profit Status: The Tennessee Experience, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1077 (1998).

To Pay or Not to Pay: A Primer on the Federal Unrelated Business Income Tax (UBIT) for Non-tax Lawyers (Sean P. Scally), 37 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

48-51-102. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of chapters 51-68 of this title at any time, and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to chapters 51-68 of this title shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 1.02.

48-51-103. Eminent domain.

Chapters 51-68 of this title do not repeal or affect the right or power of eminent domain under other existing laws, and any corporation which shall have the power of eminent domain under existing laws shall have the power to the same extent and in the same manner as if organized under chapters 51-68 of this title, and all statutes of this state granting the power of eminent domain and making compensation shall remain in force and effect and applicable to the appropriate existing corporations and to the appropriate corporations organized under chapters 51-68 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 1.03.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 2, 3.

48-51-104. Applicability.

Chapters 51-68 of this title shall apply to every nonprofit corporation now existing or hereafter formed; provided, that if there are other specific statutory provisions which govern the formation of, impose restrictions or requirements on, confer special powers, privileges or authorities on, or fix special procedures or methods for, special categories of corporations, then to the extent such provisions are inconsistent with or different from chapters 51-68 of this title, such provisions shall prevail.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 1.04.

Attorney General Opinions. Merger of telephone cooperative and for-profit Tennessee corporation, OAG 99-070, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (3/22/99).

Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality, OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06).